Tennessee, session 114, SB1576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-208, is amended by deleting the
second sentence and substituting instead the following:
The department shall make the form publicly available on its website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1576
010658
- 1 -